Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-602.01
Release of information; written agreements authorized.

All information designated by the department on all certificates as being for health data and statistical research shall be confidential but may be released to the department for research and statistical purposes. The department may release cost, health, and associated health risk information from medicaid records to the department for research and statistical purposes. Such release shall provide for protection of the security of the content of the information, including access limitations, storage of the information, destruction of the information, and use of the information. The release of such information pursuant to this section shall not make otherwise confidential information a public record.

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 61;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 514;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 402.